District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

11-2305

Possession of evidence and property.

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 519, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Nov. 22, 2000, 114 Stat. 2440, Pub. L. 106-522, § 148(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-2305.
1973 Ed., § 11-2305.